District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-204

Reimbursement of United States for expenses of United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 13, 1982, 96 Stat. 877, Pub. L. 97-258, § 5(b)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-204.